California statutes. Financial Code
(2) No part of the net earnings of the organization inures to the benefit of a private shareholder or individual.

(3) A broker’s fee is not paid in connection with the making of the loan that is facilitated by the organization.

(4) An organization wishing to operate pursuant to an exemption granted under this section shall file an application for exemption with the commissioner, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, and shall pay a fee to the commissioner, in an amount calculated by the commissioner to cover his or her costs to administer this section and Section 22067. The commissioner may refuse to grant an exemption, or to suspend or revoke a previously issued exemption if he or she finds that one or more of the provisions of this section were not met or are not being met by the organization and that denial, suspension, or revocation of the exemption is in the best interests of the public.

(5) Every organization whose exemption is approved by the commissioner shall file an annual report with the commissioner on or before March 15 of each year, containing relevant information that the commissioner
 reasonably requires concerning lending facilitated by the organization within the state during the preceding calendar year at all locations at which the organization facilitates lending. The commissioner shall compile the information submitted pursuant to this paragraph for use in preparing the report required by Section 22067.

(6) Any loan made pursuant to this section shall comply with the following requirements:

(A) The loan shall be unsecured.

(B) Interest shall not be imposed.

(C) An administrative fee may be charged in an amount not to exceed the following:

(i) Seven percent of the principal amount, exclusive of the administrative fee, or ninety dollars ($90), whichever is less, on
 the first loan made to a borrower.

(ii) Six percent of the principal amount, exclusive of the administrative fee, or seventy-five dollars ($75), whichever is less, on the second and subsequent loans made to that borrower.

(D) An organization shall not charge the same borrower an administrative fee more than once in any four-month period. Each administrative fee shall be fully earned immediately upon consummation of a loan agreement.

(E) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 22320.5 and in lieu of any other type of delinquency fee or late fee, an organization may require reimbursement from a borrower of up to ten dollars ($10) to cover an insufficient funds fee incurred by that organization due to actions of the borrower. An organization shall not charge more than two insufficient funds fees to the same borrower
 in a single month.

(F) The following information shall be disclosed to the consumer in writing, in a typeface no smaller than 12-point type, at the time of the loan application:

(i) The amount to be borrowed, the total dollar cost of the loan to the consumer if the loan is paid back on time, including the sum of the administrative fee and principal amount borrowed, the corresponding annual percentage rate, calculated in accordance with Federal Reserve Board Regulation Z (12 C.F.R. 226.1), the periodic payment amount, the payment frequency, and the insufficient funds fee, if applicable.

(ii) An explanation of whether, and under what circumstances, a borrower may exit a loan agreement.

(G) The loan shall have a minimum principal amount upon origination of
 two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and a maximum principal amount upon origination of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), and a term of not less than the following:

(i) Ninety days for loans whose principal balance upon origination is less than five hundred dollars ($500).

(ii) One hundred twenty days for loans whose principal balance upon origination is at least five hundred dollars ($500), but is less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(iii) One hundred eighty days for loans whose principal balance upon origination is at least one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(H) The loan shall not be refinanced.

(I) The organization or any of its wholly owned subsidiaries
 shall not sell or assign unpaid debt to an independent party for collection before at least 90 days have passed since the start of the delinquency.

(7) Prior to disbursement of loan proceeds, the organization shall either (A) offer a credit education program or seminar to the borrower that has been previously reviewed and approved by the commissioner for use in complying with this section, or (B) invite the borrower to a credit education program or seminar offered by an independent third party that has been previously reviewed and approved by the commissioner for use in complying with this section. A credit education program or seminar offered pursuant to this paragraph shall be provided at no cost to the borrower.

(8) The organization shall report each borrower’s payment performance to at least one consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a
 nationwide basis, upon acceptance as a data furnisher by that consumer reporting agency. For purposes of this section, a consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis is one that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p)). An organization that is accepted as a data furnisher after being granted an exemption by the commissioner pursuant to this subdivision shall report all borrower payment performance since its inception of lending under the program, as soon as practicable after its acceptance into the program, but in no event more than six months after its acceptance into the program.

(9) The organization shall underwrite each loan and shall ensure that a loan is not made if, through its underwriting, the organization determines that the borrower’s total monthly debt service payments, at the time of loan origination, including the
 loan for which the borrower is being considered, and across all outstanding forms of credit that can be independently verified by the organization, exceed 50 percent of the borrower’s gross monthly household income except as specified in clause (iii) of subparagraph (D).

(A) The organization shall seek information and documentation pertaining to all of a borrower’s outstanding debt obligations during the loan application and underwriting process, including loans that are self-reported by the borrower but not available through independent verification. The organization shall verify that information using a credit report from at least one consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis or through other available electronic debt verification services that provide reliable evidence of a borrower’s outstanding debt obligations.

(B) The
 organization shall also request from the borrower and include all information obtained from the borrower regarding outstanding deferred deposit transactions in the calculation of the borrower’s outstanding debt obligations.

(C) The organization shall not be required to consider, for purposes of debt-to-income ratio evaluation, loans from friends or family.

(D) The organization shall also verify the borrower’s household income that the organization relies on to determine the borrower’s debt-to-income ratio using information from any of the following:

(i) Electronic means or services that provide reliable evidence of the borrower’s actual income.

(ii) Internal Revenue Service Form W-2, tax returns, payroll receipts, bank statements, or other third-party
 documents that provide reasonably reliable evidence of the borrower’s actual income.

(iii) A signed statement from the borrower stating sources and amounts of income, if the borrower’s actual income cannot be independently verified using electronic means or services, Internal Revenue Service forms, tax returns, payroll receipts, bank statements, or other third-party documents. If income is verified using a signed statement from a borrower, a loan shall not be made if the borrower’s total monthly debt service payments, at the time of loan origination, including the loan for which the borrower is being considered, and across all outstanding forms of credit, exceed 25 percent of the borrower’s gross monthly household income.

(10) The organization shall notify each borrower, at least two days prior to each payment due date, informing the borrower of the amount due and the payment due
 date. Notification may be provided by any means mutually acceptable to the borrower and the organization. A borrower shall have the right to opt out of this notification at any time, upon electronic or written request to the organization. The organization shall notify each borrower of this right prior to disbursing loan proceeds.

(11) Notwithstanding Sections 22311 to 22315, inclusive, no organization, in connection with, or incidental to, the facilitating of any loan made pursuant to this section, may offer, sell, or require a borrower to contract for “credit insurance” as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22314 or insurance on tangible personal or real property of the type specified in Section 22313.

(12) An organization shall not require, as a condition of making a loan, that a borrower waive any right, penalty, remedy, forum, or procedure provided for in
 any law applicable to the loan, including the right to file and pursue a civil action or file a complaint with or otherwise communicate with the commissioner or any court or other public entity, or that the borrower agree to resolve disputes in a jurisdiction outside of California or to the application of laws other than those of California, as provided by law. Any waiver by a borrower must be knowing, voluntary, and in writing, and expressly not made a condition of doing business with the organization. Any waiver that is required as a condition of doing business with the organization shall be presumed involuntary, unconscionable, against public policy, and unenforceable. The organization has the burden of proving that a waiver of any rights, penalties, forums, or procedures was knowing, voluntary, and not made a condition of the contract with the borrower.

(13) An organization shall not refuse to do business with or discriminate against a
 borrower or applicant on the basis that the borrower or applicant refuses to waive any right, penalty, remedy, forum, or procedure, including the right to file and pursue a civil action or complaint with, or otherwise notify, the commissioner or any court or other public entity. The exercise of a person’s right to refuse to waive any right, penalty, remedy, forum, or procedure, including a rejection of a contract requiring a waiver, shall not affect any otherwise legal terms of a contract or an agreement.

(14) This section does not apply to any agreement to waive any right, penalty, remedy, forum, or procedure, including any agreement to arbitrate a claim or dispute, after a claim or dispute has arisen. This section does not affect the enforceability or validity of any other provision of the contract.

(d) This division does not apply to a nonprofit organization that partners with
 an organization granted an exemption pursuant to subdivision (c) for the purpose of facilitating zero-interest, low-cost loans, provided that the requirements of paragraphs (6) to (14), inclusive, of subdivision (c), and the following additional conditions are met:

(1) The partnership of each exempt organization and each partnering organization shall be formalized through a written agreement that specifies the obligations of each party. Each written agreement shall contain a provision establishing that the partnering organization agrees to comply with the provisions of this section and any regulations that may be adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this section. Each written agreement shall be provided to the commissioner upon request.

(2) Each partnering organization shall meet the requirements for federal income tax exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
 Code and shall be organized and operated exclusively for one or more of the purposes described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) No part of the net earnings of the partnering organization shall inure to the benefit of a private shareholder or individual.

(4) Each exempt organization shall notify the commissioner within 30 days of entering into a written agreement with a partnering organization, on such form and in such manner as the commissioner may prescribe. At a minimum, this notification shall include the name of the partnering organization, the contact information for a person responsible for the lending activities facilitated by that partnering organization, and the address or addresses at which the organization facilitates lending activities.

(5) Upon a determination that a partnering
 organization has acted in violation of this section or any regulation adopted thereunder, the commissioner may disqualify that partnering organization from performing services under this section, bar that organization from performing services at one or more specific locations of that organization, terminate a written agreement between a partnering organization and an exempt organization, and, if the commissioner deems such action to be in the public interest, prohibit the use of that partnering organization by all organizations granted exemptions by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (c).

(6) The exempt organization shall include information regarding the loans facilitated by the partnering organization in the annual report required pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(e) The commissioner may examine each exempt organization and each partnering organization for
 compliance with the provisions of this section, upon reasonable notice to the party responsible for the lending activities facilitated by that organization. An organization so examined shall make available to the commissioner or his or her representative all books and records requested by the commissioner related to the lending activities facilitated by that organization. The cost of the examination shall be paid by the exempt organization.

(f) This section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22251. For purposes of this subdivision, “bona fide principal amount” shall be determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 156.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22067.

(a) On or before July 1 of each year, the commissioner shall post a report on the department’s internet website summarizing the information described in subdivision (b). The information disclosed to the commissioner for the commissioner’s use in preparing the report described in this section is exempted from any requirement of public disclosure by subdivision (b) of Section 7929.000 of the Government Code.

(b) The report required by this section shall specify the time period to which the report corresponds, and shall include, but not be limited to, the following for that time period:

(1) The number of organizations that applied for
 exemptions pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 22066, and the number of organizations that entered into partnerships with exempt organizations in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 22066.

(2) The number of organizations granted exemptions and the types of exemptions granted.

(3) The reason or reasons for denying applications for exemptions, if applicable. This information shall be provided in a manner that does not identify the entity or entities denied.

(4) The number of borrowers who applied for loans through exempt or partnering organizations, the number of borrowers granted loans facilitated by exempt or partnering organizations, the total amount loaned, and the distribution of loan lengths upon origination.

(5) The number of borrowers who obtained more than one loan through an exempt or partnering organization and the distribution of the number of loans per borrower.

(6) Of the number of borrowers who obtained more than one loan facilitated by an exempt or a partnering organization, the percentage of those borrowers whose credit scores increased between successive loans, based on information from at least one major credit bureau, and the average size of the increase.

(7) The income distribution of borrowers upon loan origination, including the number of borrowers who obtained at least one loan and who resided in a low-to-moderate-income census tract at the time of their loan application.

(8) The number of borrowers who obtained loans facilitated by an exempt or a partnering organization for the following purposes, based on borrower responses at the time of their loan applications indicating the primary purpose for which the loan was obtained:

(A) Medical.

(B) Other emergency.

(C) Vehicle repair.

(D) Vehicle purchase.

(E) To pay bills.

(F) To consolidate debt.

(G) To build or repair credit
 history.

(H) To finance a purchase of goods or services other than a vehicle.

(I) For other than personal, family, or household purposes.

(J) Other.

(9) The number of borrowers who self-report that they had a bank account at the time of their loan application, the number of borrowers who self-report that they had a bank account and used check-cashing services, and the number of borrowers who self-report that they did not have a bank account at the time of their loan application.

(10) The performance of loans under Section 22066, as reflected by all of the following:

(A) The number and percentage of borrowers who experienced at least one late payment lasting between 7 and 29 days and who subsequently brought the loan current, and the distribution of principal loan amounts corresponding to those late payments.

(B) The number and percentage of borrowers who experienced at least one late payment lasting between 30 and 59 days and who subsequently brought the loan current, and the distribution of principal loan amounts corresponding to those late payments.

(C) The number and percentage of borrowers who experienced at least one late payment lasting 60 days or more and who subsequently brought the loan current, and the distribution of principal loan amounts corresponding to those late
 payments.

(D) The number and percentage of borrowers who experienced at least one late payment of greater than seven days and who did not subsequently bring the loan current.

(E) Among loans that were ever late for seven days or more, the average number of times borrowers experienced a late payment of seven days or more.

(11) The number and types of violations of Section 22066 by exempt organizations, which were documented by the commissioner.

(12) The number and types of violations of Section 22066 by partnering organizations, which were documented by the commissioner.

(13) The number
 of times the commissioner suspended or revoked an exemption granted to an exempt organization pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 22066 and the number of times a partnering organization was sanctioned by the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 22066.

(14) The number of complaints received by the commissioner about an exempt organization or a partnering organization, and the nature of those complaints.

(15) Recommendations, if any, for improving the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 111.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

22068.

(a) The exemptions and exclusions in this article are not applicable to a person engaged in business as a program administrator or a PACE solicitor.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 19.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licensing [22100. - 22112.]

22100.

(a) No person shall engage in the business of a finance lender or broker without obtaining a license from the commissioner.

(b) Every licensee engaging in the business of making or brokering residential mortgage loans shall require that every mortgage loan originator employed or compensated by that licensee obtains and maintains a mortgage loan originator license from the commissioner under this division or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000), or has first obtained a license endorsement from the Commissioner of Real Estate pursuant to Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 10166.01) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) A finance lender or broker shall not employ a mortgage loan originator whose license or license endorsement has lapsed.

(d) A finance lender or broker may not make or broker a residential mortgage loan unless that loan is offered by, negotiated by, or applied for through a licensed mortgage loan originator.

(e) Every licensee engaged in the business of making or brokering residential mortgage loans and every mortgage loan originator licensed under this division shall register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(f) An individual shall not engage in the business of a mortgage loan
 originator with respect to any dwelling located in this state without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license in accordance with the requirements of this division and any rules promulgated by the commissioner under this chapter.

(g) A registered mortgage loan originator, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22013, is exempt from licensure under this section when he or she is employed by:

 (1) A depository institution.

 (2) A subsidiary of a depository institution that is owned and controlled by a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency.

(3) An institution regulated by the Farm Credit
 Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 264, Sec. 4.   (AB 2666)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22100.5.

(a) A person shall not engage in the business of a program administrator without obtaining a license from the commissioner.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 20.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22101.

(a) An application for a license as a finance lender, broker, or program administrator under this division shall be in the form and contain the information that the commissioner may by rule or order require and shall be filed upon payment of the fee specified in Section 22103.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, an applicant who does not currently hold a license as a finance lender, broker, or program administrator under this division shall furnish, with their application, a full set of fingerprints and related information for purposes of the commissioner conducting a criminal history record check. The commissioner shall obtain and receive criminal history information from the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation pursuant to Section
 22101.5.

(c) This section does not prevent a licensee from engaging in the business of a finance lender or program administrator through a subsidiary corporation if the subsidiary corporation is licensed pursuant to this division.

(d) For purposes of this section, “subsidiary corporation” means a corporation that is wholly owned by a licensee.

(e) A new application shall not be required for a change in the address of an existing location previously licensed under this division. However, the licensee shall comply with the requirements of Section 22153.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, the commissioner may by rule require an application to be made through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, and may require fees,
 fingerprints, financial statements, supporting documents, changes of address, and any other information, and amendments or modifications thereto, to be submitted in the same manner.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may by rule or order prescribe circumstances under which to accept electronic records or electronic signatures. This section does not require the commissioner to accept electronic records or electronic signatures.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electronic record” means an initial license application, or material modification of that license application, and any other record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means. “Electronic records” also includes, but is not limited to, all of the
 following:

(A) An application, amendment, supplement, and exhibit, filed for any license, consent, or other authority.

(B) A financial statement, a report, or advertising.

(C) An order, license, consent, or other authority.

(D) A notice of public hearing, accusation, and statement of issues in connection with any application, license, consent, or other authority.

(E) A proposed decision of a hearing officer and a decision of the commissioner.

(F) The transcripts of a hearing and correspondence between a party and the commissioner directly relating to the record.

(G) A release, newsletter, interpretive opinion, determination, or specific ruling.

(H) Correspondence between a party and the commissioner directly relating to any document listed in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(2) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(i) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation has continuously implemented methods to accept records filed electronically, and is encouraged to continue to expand its use of electronic filings to the extent feasible, as budget, resources, and equipment are made available to accomplish that goal.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 133.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22101.5.

(a) The commissioner shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all finance lender, broker, or program administrator license candidates, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 22101, for purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions, state or federal arrests, and information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(b) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal
 summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the commissioner.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The commissioner shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for license candidates described in subdivision (a).

(e) The
 Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the costs of processing the requests pursuant to this section.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, the commissioner may by rule require fingerprints submitted by an applicant to be submitted to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in addition to the Department of Justice. 

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 24.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22102.

(a) A finance lender, broker, or program administrator licensee seeking to engage in business at a new location shall submit an application for a branch office license to the commissioner at least 10 days before engaging in business at a new location and pay the fee required by Section 22103. The commissioner may require an applicant seeking to engage in business at a new location to submit its application, or parts thereof, through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. 

(b) The licensee may engage in business at the new location 10 days after the date of submission of a branch office application.

(c) (1) The commissioner shall approve or deny the person responsible for the lending activity at the new location in accordance with Section 22109, and shall notify the licensee of this decision within 90 days of the date of receipt of the application.

(2) If the commissioner denies the application, the licensee shall, within 10 days of the date of receipt of notification of the commissioner’s denial, submit a new application to the commissioner designating a different person responsible for the lending activity at the new location. The commissioner shall approve or deny the different person as provided in paragraph (1).

(d) A licensee shall not engage in business at a
 new location in a name other than a name approved by the commissioner.

(e) The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this section.

(f) A branch office license to engage in business at a new location shall be issued in accordance with this section. A change of street address of a place of business designated in a license shall be made in accordance with Section 22153 and shall not constitute a new location subject to the requirements of this section. 

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 26.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22103.

(a) At the time of filing the application for a finance lender, broker, program administrator, or branch office license, the applicant shall pay to the commissioner the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) as a fee for investigating the application, plus the cost of fingerprint processing and the criminal history record check under Section 22101.5, and two hundred dollars ($200) as an application fee. The investigation fee, including the amount for the criminal history record check, and the application fee are not refundable if an application is denied or withdrawn. 

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 27) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 28.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22104.

(a) The applicant shall file with the application for a finance lender, broker, or program administrator license financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and acceptable to the commissioner that indicate a net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), a licensee shall maintain a net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) at all times.

(b) A licensed finance lender or broker, that employs one or more mortgage loan originators and that makes residential mortgage loans, shall continuously maintain a minimum net worth of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(c) A licensed finance broker, that employs one or more mortgage loan originators and that arranges, but does not make, residential mortgage loans, shall continuously maintain a minimum net worth of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(d) The commissioner may promulgate rules or regulations with respect to the requirements for minimum net worth, as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this division and comply with the SAFE Act. 

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 29) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 30.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22105.

(a) Upon the filing of an application pursuant to Section 22101 and the payment of the fees, the commissioner shall investigate the applicant and its general partners and persons owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or any person responsible for the conduct of the applicant’s lending or program administration activities in this state, if the applicant is a partnership. If the applicant is a corporation, trust, limited liability company, or association, including an unincorporated organization, the commissioner shall investigate the applicant, its principal officers, directors, managing members, and persons owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding equity securities or any person responsible for the conduct of the applicant’s
 lending activities or for administering PACE programs for the applicant in this state. Upon the filing of an application pursuant to Section 22102 and the payment of the fees, the commissioner shall investigate the person responsible for the lending activity of the licensee, or for administering one or more PACE programs for the licensee, at the new location described in the application. The investigation may be limited to information that was not included in prior applications filed pursuant to this division. If the commissioner determines that the applicant has satisfied this division and does not find facts constituting reasons for denial under Section 22109, the commissioner shall issue and deliver a license to the applicant.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “principal officers” shall mean president, chief executive officer, treasurer, and chief financial officer, as may be applicable, and any other officer with direct responsibility
 for the conduct of the applicant’s lending activities or for PACE program administration for the applicant within the state.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 32) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 813, Sec. 3.   (AB 2063)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22105.1.

(a) An applicant for a mortgage loan originator license shall apply by submitting the uniform form prescribed for such purpose by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. The commissioner may require the submission of additional information or supporting documentation to the department.

(b) Section 461 of the Business and Professions Code shall not be applicable to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation when using a national uniform application adopted or approved for use by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry in connection with the SAFE Act.

(c) In connection with an application for a license as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a
 minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant’s identity, including the following:

(1) Fingerprint images and related information, for purposes of performing a federal, or both a state and federal, criminal history background check.

(2) Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain both of the following:

(A) An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency.

(B) Information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

(d) The commissioner may ask the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to obtain state criminal history background check information on applicants described in subdivision (a) using the procedures set forth in subdivisions (e) and (f).

(e) If the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry electronically submits fingerprint images and related information, as required by the Department of Justice, for an applicant for a mortgage loan originator license, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state convictions and state arrests and to the existence and content of a record of state arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their recognizance pending trial or appeal, the Department of Justice shall provide an electronic response to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
 System and Registry pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and shall provide the same electronic response to the commissioner.

(f) The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry may request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in subdivision (a). The Department of Justice shall provide the same electronic response to the commissioner.

(g) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the requests described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 134.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22105.2.

(a) The commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this division.

(b) For the purpose of participating in
 the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, the commissioner is authorized to waive or modify, in whole or in part, by rule, regulation, or order, any or all of the requirements of this division and to establish new requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

(c) The commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from, and distributing information to, the Department of Justice or any governmental agency.

(d) The commissioner may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the commissioner.

(e) The commissioner shall establish a process where
 applicants and licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry by the commissioner.
